Utah statutes.
31A-35-103.   Exemption from other sections of this title.

Bail bond surety companies are exempted from:

(1)  Chapter 3, Department Funding, Fees, and Taxes, except Section 31A-3-103;

(2)  Chapter 4, Insurance in General, except Sections 31A-4-102, 31A-4-103, 31A-4-104, and 31A-4-107;

(3)  Chapter 5, Domestic Stock and Mutual Insurance Corporations, except Section 31A-5-103, and

(4)  Chapters 6, 6a, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 12, 13, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 24, 25, 26, 27, 27a, 28, 29, 30, 31, 32, 33, and 34.

